test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-palymash_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:


  Noun - палымаш: # Noun 'knowledge'

     палымаш+N+Sg+Nom: палымаш
     палымаш+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: палымашем
     палымаш+N+Sg+Nom+Foc/at: палымашат
     палымаш+N+Sg+Gen: палымашын
     палымаш+N+Sg+Dat: палымашлан
     палымаш+N+Pl+Nom: [палымаш-влак, палымаш-шамыч]
     палымаш+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: [палымашыже, палымашше, палымашыж]
     палымаш+N+Sg+Ine: [палымашыште, палымаште]
     палымаш+N+Sg+Ill: [палымашышке, палымашке, палымашыш]

     палымаш+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Foc/Poss: палымашемже
     палымаш+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Foc/Poss: палымашетше
     палымаш+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Foc/Poss: [палымашыжыже, палымашшыже]
     палымаш+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Foc/Poss: палымашнаже
     палымаш+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Foc/Poss: палымашдаже
     палымаш+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Foc/Poss: палымашыштше
